Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 9. Actions By Partners.

§79-14-901.
Direct action by partner.

Subject to subsection (b), a partner may maintain a direct action against another partner or the limited partnership, with or without an accounting as to the partnership’s activities and affairs, to enforce the partner’s rights and otherwise protect the partner’s interests, including rights and interests under the partnership agreement or this chapter or arising independently of the partnership relationship.

A partner maintaining a direct action under this section must plead and prove an actual or threatened injury that is not solely the result of an injury suffered or threatened to be suffered by the limited partnership.

A right to an accounting on a dissolution and winding up does not revive a claim barred by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-901 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 901, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the law governing foreign limited partnerships. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-1001.

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership §§ 914, 915.

§79-14-902.
Derivative action.

A partner may maintain a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited partnership if:

The partner first makes a demand on the general partners, requesting that they cause the partnership to bring an action to enforce the right, and the general partners do not bring the action within a reasonable time; or

A demand under paragraph (1) would be futile.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-902 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 902;
Laws, 1990, ch. 385, § 4;
Laws, 1995, ch. 362, § 5;
Laws,
1997, ch. 418, § 21;
Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 94, effective from and after January 1, 2013; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] required foreign limited partnerships to register with the Secretary of State before doing business in Mississippi. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-1002.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (3), which formerly read: “The name and street and mailing address of any registered agent for service of process on the foreign limited partnership whom the foreign limited partnership elects to appoint; the registered agent must be an individual resident of this state, a domestic corporation or a foreign corporation having a place of business in and authorized to do business in this state”; and deleted former (4), which provided the Secretary of State would be appointed registered agent of a foreign limited partnership for service of process under certain circumstances, and reserved the paragraph designator.

Filing fees, see § 79-14-1104.

§79-14-903.
Proper plaintiff.

A derivative action to enforce a right of a limited partnership may be maintained only by a person that is a partner at the time the action is commenced and:

Was a partner when the conduct giving rise to the action occurred; or

Whose status as a partner devolved on the person by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the partnership agreement from a person that was a partner at the time of the conduct.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-903 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 903;
Laws, 1990, ch. 385, § 5;
Laws, 1995, ch. 362, § 6;
Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 22, effective from and after July 1, 1997; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the issuance of a foreign limited partnership registration. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-210.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

§79-14-904.
Pleading.

In a derivative action, the complaint must state with particularity:

The date and content of plaintiff’s demand and the response to the demand by the general partner; or

Why demand should be excused as futile.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-904 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 904, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the name under which a foreign limited partnership could register. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-114.

Name requirements applicable to limited partnerships generally, see § 79-14-102.

§79-14-905.
Special litigation committee.

If a limited partnership is named as or made a party in a derivative proceeding, the partnership may appoint a special litigation committee to investigate the claims asserted in the proceeding and determine whether pursuing the action is in the best interests of the partnership. If the partnership appoints a special litigation committee, on motion by the committee made in the name of the partnership, except for good cause shown, the court shall stay discovery for the time reasonably necessary to permit the committee to make its investigation. This subsection does not prevent the court from:

Enforcing a person’s right to information under Section 79-14-304 or 79-14-407; or

Granting extraordinary relief in the form of a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction.

Be settled on terms approved by the committee; or

Be dismissed.

A special litigation committee must be composed of one or more disinterested and independent individuals, who may be partners.

A special litigation committee may be appointed:

By a majority of the general partners not named as parties in the proceeding; or

If all general partners are named as parties in the proceeding, by a majority of the general partners named as defendants.

After appropriate investigation, a special litigation committee may determine that it is in the best interests of the limited partnership that the proceeding:

Continue under the control of the plaintiff;

Continue under the control of the committee;

After making a determination under subsection (d), a special litigation committee shall file with the court a statement of its determination and its report supporting its determination and shall serve each party with a copy of the determination and report. The court shall determine whether the members of the committee were disinterested and independent and whether the committee conducted its investigation and made its recommendation in good faith, independently, and with reasonable care, with the committee having the burden of proof. If the court finds that the members of the committee were disinterested and independent and that the committee acted in good faith, independently, and with reasonable care, the court shall enforce the determination of the committee. Otherwise, the court shall dissolve the stay of discovery entered under subsection (a) and allow the action to continue under the control of the plaintiff.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-905 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 905;
Laws, 1995, ch. 362, § 7;
Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 23, effective from and after July 1, 1997; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to changes and amendments to the registration statement. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-1004.

§79-14-906.
Proceeds and expenses.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b):

Any proceeds or other benefits of a derivative action, whether by judgment, compromise, or settlement, belong to the limited partnership and not to the plaintiff; and

If the plaintiff receives any proceeds, the plaintiff shall remit them immediately to the partnership.

If a derivative action is successful in whole or in part, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, from the recovery of the limited partnership.

A derivative action on behalf of a limited partnership may not be voluntarily dismissed or settled without the court’s approval.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-906 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 906;
Laws, 1995, ch. 362, § 8;
Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 24, effective from and after July 1, 1997; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the cancellation of a foreign limited partnership’s registration.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Filing fees, see § 79-14-1104.

§79-14-907.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective July 1, 2015.

§79-14-907. [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 907, effective from and after January 1, 1988].

Former § 79-14-907 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 907, effective from and after January 1, 1988 related to the transaction of business without registration. For present similar provisions, see § 79-14-1002.

§79-14-908.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective July 1, 2015.

§79-14-908. [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 908, effective from and after January 1, 1988].

Former
§ 79-14-908 related to actions by the Attorney General. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-1012.

§79-14-909.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective July 1, 2015.

§79-14-909. [Laws, 1995, ch. 362, § 9, effective from and after July 1, 1995].

Former § 79-14-909 provided that a document filed under former Chapter 14 that contained a copy of a signature was acceptable for filing.

§79-14-910.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective July 1, 2015.

§79-14-910. [Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 95, effective from and after January 1, 2013].

Former § 79-14-910 provided the grounds for an administrative revocation of a foreign limited partnership's registration. For present similar provisions, see § 79-14-1010.

§79-14-911.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective July 1, 2015.

§79-14-911. [Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 96, effective from and after January 1, 2013].

Former § 79-14-911 provided the procedure for the administrative revocation of a foreign limited partnership's registration. For present similar provisions, see § 79-14-1010.

§79-14-912.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective July 1, 2015.

§79-14-912. [Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 97, effective from and after January 1, 2013].

Former § 79-14-912 related to the reinstatement of a revoked foreign limited partnership registration.

§79-14-913.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective July 1, 2015.

§79-14-913. [Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 98, effective from and after January 1, 2013].

Former § 79-14-913 related to appeals from denials of reinstatement.